Illinois, session 104th, SB1370.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The University of Illinois Act is amended by 5adding Section 7j as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 305/7j new)7    Sec. 7j. Chancellor advocacy. The chancellor of any campus 8of the University shall advocate for what is beneficial and in 9the best interests of that campus if it interferes with what is 10beneficial and in the best interests of the university system 11as a whole.  12    Section 10. The Southern Illinois University Management 13Act is amended by adding Section 8j as follows: 14    (110 ILCS 520/8j new)15    Sec. 8j. Chancellor advocacy. The chancellor of any campus 16of the University shall advocate for what is beneficial and in 17the best interests of that campus if it interferes with what is 18beneficial and in the best interests of the university system 19as a whole.